Georgia statutes. TITLE 47 Retirement and Pensions
Article 4 Membership in the Retirement System

47-3-60.
Eligibility; termination; leaves of absence; service credit for postgraduate study; transfer of service credit.

Any person who becomes a teacher after January 1, 1944, shall become a member of the retirement system as a condition of his or her employment, except as otherwise provided in this chapter.

Any person who was a teacher on January 1, 1943, or became a teacher prior to January 1, 1944, shall be a member unless prior to January 1, 1944, he or she filed with the board of trustees, on a form provided by it, a notice of his or her election not to be included in the membership of the retirement system and a duly executed waiver of all present and prospective benefits which would otherwise accrue to him or her by participating in the retirement system. Such a teacher who elected not to become a member may at any time thereafter apply for and be admitted to membership, but without credit for that service rendered after July 1, 1943, and before the time he or she becomes a member, and without prior service credit.

Reserved.

A teacher otherwise eligible shall be classified as a member only while he or she is in the service of an employer not operating a local retirement system.

The membership of any member shall terminate upon the member’s:

Death;

Retirement under this retirement system;

Withdrawal of his or her contributions;

Rendering less than one year of service in a period of five consecutive years as a member; or

Employment by an employer which operates a local retirement fund, unless the member has ten or more years of creditable service with this retirement system, in which case the member may elect to continue membership in this retirement system, subject to the same terms and conditions as other members.

(e.1)

A member who has not withdrawn the member’s contributions to the retirement system and who has a break in service of more than four years but not more than five years may be reinstated to membership if the member pays a sum equal to 12 1/2 percent of the member’s salary for the last year of service prior to the break in service. A member who has not withdrawn the member’s contributions to the retirement system and who has a break in service of more than five years but not more than six years may be reinstated to membership if the member pays a sum equal to 25 percent of the member’s salary for the last year of service prior to the break in service. A member who has not withdrawn the member’s contributions to the retirement system may be reinstated to membership without paying the reinstatement fees after the member renders at least one year of membership service subsequent to the break in service. All interest credits shall cease after any such break in service but shall begin again on the date of payment of the sum required for reinstatement to membership or on the first day of July immediately following the completion of one year of membership service following the break in service. The board of trustees may approve the continued membership of a member while in the armed forces of the United States or other emergency wartime service of the United States, or a member whose membership would be terminated because of illness which prevents the member from rendering the service otherwise required by this Code section. The board of trustees may also grant an additional year of leave to a teacher for each child born to or adopted by such teacher while on authorized leave.

In the event a member desires to pursue a program of full-time study which will require that he or she render less than one year of service in a period of five consecutive years and which would otherwise result in termination of his or her membership, the board of trustees may approve a leave of absence for study purposes in addition to the normal four-year break in service which the member could otherwise take, so that the combined break in service does not exceed six years. Such study leave shall be continuous. In no event shall such a member’s account remain in an active status for longer than six consecutive years for such purpose.

A member who undertakes full-time graduate study designed to advance or improve his or her training or abilities as a teacher is entitled to receive creditable service for a period of graduate study under the following conditions:

The member must have been a full-time teacher in the public schools of this state or in the University System of Georgia under the board of regents immediately prior to the period of graduate study. Any such period of graduate study interrupted solely for a period of active duty military service begun during a period in which the military draft is in effect shall be deemed not to have been interrupted for purposes of this subparagraph;

The member must submit a transcript or similar document to the retirement system as verification of the graduate study pursued;

The member must return to full-time employment as a teacher in the public schools of this state or in the University System of Georgia under the board of regents for a minimum of five years following such period of graduate study;

The member must pay the appropriate member contributions plus applicable accrued interest in accordance with regulations adopted by the board of trustees on the basis of the salary the member was receiving for full-time employment as a teacher immediately prior to the period of graduate study; and

Either the member’s present employer or the member must pay the appropriate employer contributions and applicable accrued interest thereon if the source of funds from which the member was paid immediately prior to his or her period of graduate study was other than state funds.

The foregoing provisions of this subsection shall apply to periods of graduate study heretofore and hereafter granted, but nothing contained in this subsection shall be construed to rescind any creditable service granted prior to July 1, 1981, pursuant to this subsection or its predecessors.

Any other provisions of law to the contrary notwithstanding, if a member with ten or more years’ creditable service after becoming a member is employed by an employer operating a local retirement fund, his or her membership does not automatically terminate and he or she may elect to maintain his or her membership rather than participate in the local retirement fund, subject to the same terms and conditions as other members of the retirement system.

New certified professional personnel employed for the first time by the State Board of Education or by the State Department of Education on and after July 1, 1983, shall become members of the retirement system as a condition of employment, unless such personnel elect membership in the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia at the time of their employment. Such election shall be made in writing to the board of trustees of this retirement system and to the board of trustees of the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia. Once such election is made by such personnel, the election is irrevocable during the tenure of employment with the State Board of Education or the State Department of Education. The State Board of Education shall provide by regulation for informing prospective employees who are to be employed as certified professional personnel of the option provided for by this subsection so that such personnel may choose membership in this retirement system or the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia at the time of their employment.

(h.1)

Personnel employed for the first time by the State Board of Education or by the State Department of Education on or after July 1, 1988, who, at the time of becoming so employed, are members of this retirement system shall continue as members of this retirement system unless such personnel elect membership in the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia at the time of their employment. Such election shall be made in writing to the board of trustees of this retirement system and to the board of trustees of the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia. Once such election is made by such personnel, the election is irrevocable during the tenure of employment with the State Board of Education or the State Department of Education. The State Board of Education shall provide by regulation for informing prospective employees who are subject to the provisions of this subsection of the option provided for by this subsection so that such personnel may choose to continue membership in this retirement system or become members of the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia at the time of their employment.

This subsection shall apply to certified professional personnel in the unclassified service as defined by Code Section 45-20-2 who are employed by the State Board of Education or the State Department of Education on July 1, 1986, and who are members of the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia and have at least five years of membership service in said retirement system as of July 1, 1986.

This subsection shall also apply to any personnel employed by the State Board of Education or by the State Department of Education at any time before July 1, 1988, who are members of the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia and who, at the time of becoming employed by said state board or department, had ten or more years of membership service in this retirement system.

At any time from July 1, 1988, until not later than July 1, 1989, personnel described in paragraphs (1) and (2) of this subsection are authorized to transfer service credits and membership, including employer and employee contributions, from the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia to this retirement system. Any such personnel electing to transfer such service credits and membership to this retirement system shall be required to make additional contributions to this retirement system so that the annuity account balance of the transferring person shall be the same as though the transferring person had been a member of this retirement system during the period of time for which service credits are transferred from the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia to this retirement system or, in the absence of such payment, the board of trustees of this retirement system shall adjust the transferring person’s credits in proportion to the contributions transferred from the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia to this retirement system. Any such personnel shall exercise the authority provided by this paragraph by written notification to the board of trustees of each of the retirement systems.

If any person who transfers to this retirement system pursuant to the authority of this subsection subsequently becomes employed in a position where membership in the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia is required, any creditable service obtained under this retirement system for teaching service in school systems of other states pursuant to Code Section 47-3-89 shall not be eligible for transfer as creditable service to the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia, notwithstanding the provisions of Code Section 47-2-92 or any other provision of Chapter 2 of this title, relating to the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia.

Newly hired professional personnel employed for the first time by the Technical College System of Georgia on and after July 1, 1985, and all full-time nonprofessional personnel employed for the first time after July 1, 1987, by postsecondary vocational-technical schools governed by the state board shall become members of the Teachers Retirement System of Georgia as a condition of employment if otherwise eligible under laws, rules, and regulations, unless such personnel elect membership in the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia and are otherwise eligible under laws, rules, and regulations. Once such election is made by such personnel, the election is irrevocable during the tenure of employment with the Technical College System of Georgia or any postsecondary vocational-technical school governed thereby. Newly hired employees not eligible for membership in the Teachers Retirement System of Georgia or the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia shall become members of the Public School Employees Retirement System as a condition of employment if eligible. The Technical College System of Georgia shall provide by regulation for informing prospective employees who are to be employed as certified professional personnel of the option provided for by this subsection so that such personnel shall choose membership in the Teachers Retirement System of Georgia or the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia or the Public School Employees Retirement System at the time of their employment.

All full-time employees of a postsecondary vocational-technical school formerly operated by a local board of education or area postsecondary vocational education board as of July 1, 1987, or the date on which the state board assumes governance of the postsecondary vocational-technical school shall elect either to continue membership in the Teachers Retirement System of Georgia or to become members of the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia. Once such election is made by such personnel, the election is irrevocable during the tenure of employment with the Technical College System of Georgia or any postsecondary vocational-technical school governed thereby. All employees who are members of the Public School Employees Retirement System may elect to continue their membership in the Public School Employees Retirement System or to become members of the Teachers Retirement System of Georgia or the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia if otherwise eligible under laws, rules, or regulations.

If any person who transfers to this retirement system pursuant to the authority of this subsection subsequently becomes employed in a position where membership in the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia is required, any creditable service obtained under this retirement system for teaching service in school systems of other states pursuant to Code Section 47-3-89 shall not be eligible for transfer as creditable service to the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia, notwithstanding the provisions of Code Section 47-2-92 or any other provision of Chapter 2 of this title.

Any other provisions of law to the contrary notwithstanding, any person at least 60 years of age who first becomes a teacher on or after July 1, 1987, and any former member of the retirement system at least 60 years of age who has withdrawn from the retirement system employee contributions made during such former membership again becoming a teacher on or after July 1, 1987, shall have the right to decline membership in the retirement system. The right shall be exercised by sending written notice to the board of trustees on a form provided by the board for such purpose. The right must be exercised within 90 days after becoming a teacher. Any person declining membership in the retirement system pursuant to this subsection shall not at any time thereafter be eligible for membership in the retirement system. Any person failing to exercise the right provided by this subsection within 90 days after becoming a teacher shall become and remain a member of the retirement system as a condition of continued employment. Any employee contributions made during the first 90 days as a teacher by a person who exercises the right provided by this subsection shall be reimbursed to the person within 30 days after the board of trustees receives the written notice declining membership in the retirement system.

Any other provisions of this chapter or of Chapter 2 of this title to the contrary notwithstanding, any member of this retirement system with five or more years of continuous membership service who is employed by Central State Hospital and who, without any break in employment, becomes employed in a position where membership in the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia is ordinarily required shall have the option to remain a member of this retirement system, notwithstanding the change in the member’s employment status. Such option shall be exercised by notification, in writing, to the boards of trustees of this retirement system and the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia. The employer of any such member who exercises the option provided by this subsection shall be an employer for the purposes of this chapter.

Any other provision of law to the contrary notwithstanding, any person who is entitled pursuant to the provisions of this article to make an election between membership in this retirement system and membership in any other retirement system and who subsequently retires and is rehired by the same employer which employed him or her immediately prior to retirement shall continue membership in the retirement system under which he or she initially retired and shall not be entitled to elect membership in any other retirement system.

History.

Ga. L. 1943, p. 640, § 3; Ga. L. 1947, p. 1494, § 1; Ga. L. 1952, p. 254, § 1; Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 270, § 1; Ga. L. 1953, Nov.-Dec. Sess., p. 394, § 1; Ga. L. 1959, p. 319, § 1; Ga. L. 1960, p. 1116, § 3; Ga. L. 1961, p. 388, § 2; Ga. L. 1964, p. 699, § 1; Ga. L. 1969, p. 384, § 1; Ga. L. 1971, p. 409, § 1; Ga. L. 1972, p. 896, § 1; Ga. L. 1973, p. 903, § 1; Ga. L. 1975, p. 1579, § 1; Ga. L. 1976, p. 1458, § 1; Ga. L. 1977, p. 825, § 1; Ga. L. 1979, p. 1007, § 1; Ga. L. 1980, p. 828, § 1; Ga. L. 1981, p. 1327, § 1; Ga. L. 1983, p. 1859, § 4; Ga. L. 1985, p. 209, § 1; Ga. L. 1986, p. 1543, § 3; Ga. L. 1986, p. 1547, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1987, p. 575, § 9; Ga. L. 1987, p. 959, § 4; Ga. L. 1988, p. 1351, §§ 3, 4; Ga. L. 1988, p. 1742, § 3; Ga. L. 1992, p. 477, § 1; Ga. L. 1993, p. 1690, § 4; Ga. L. 1996, p. 389, § 1; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1268, § 1; Ga. L. 2008, p. 562, § 1/SB 434; Ga. L. 2009, p. 752, § 1/SB 98; Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 41/SB 436; Ga. L. 2012, p. 413, § 9/HB 805.

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008, substituted “Technical College System of Georgia” for “Department of Technical and Adult Education” three times in paragraph (j)(2) and once in paragraph (j)(3).

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, substituted “State Personnel Administration” for “State Merit System of Personnel Administration” in the middle of paragraph (i)(1).

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, throughout this Code section, inserted “or her” and “or she”; and substituted “Reserved.” for the former provisions of subsection (c), which read: “Any teacher who was alive as of March 28, 1947, who has reached the age of 60, who had taught for at least 35 years as of March 19, 1943, in the public schools of the state operated by the Department of Education or any of the state educational institutions financed by this state and who retired from service in such schools or educational institutions before March 19, 1943, shall be deemed a member of the retirement system. Benefits to be paid to such a member shall be computed on the average earnings received by such a member for the last five years of actual service rendered in such schools and educational institutions.”

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, substituted “as defined by Code Section 45-20-2” for “of the State Personnel Administration” in paragraph (i)(1).

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1987, subsections (j) and (k) were redesignated as subsections (k) and (l).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “The intent of this Act is to repeal obsolete and inoperative provisions and to make certain stylistic corrections in Title 47 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated. Nothing in this Act shall deny, abridge, increase, renew, revive, or on any way affect any right, benefit, option, credit, or election to which any person was entitled pursuant to such title on June 30, 2010, and the board of trustees of each public retirement system is authorized and directed to provide by regulation for the continuation of any such right, benefit, option, credit, or election not otherwise covered in this Act; provided, however, that any such right, benefit, option, credit, or election shall be subject to the statutory provisions in effect on June 30, 2010.”

Ga. L. 2012, p. 413, § 1/HB 805, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that:
“The purpose of this Act is to make conforming amendments and correct references in Title 47 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to retirement and pensions, relative to the abolition of the State Personnel Administration and the transfer of certain functions of such agency to the Department of Administrative Services as provided by a separate Act.”
The separate Act referred to is Ga. L. 2012, p. 446/HB 642, which became effective July 1, 2012, and which provides for the abolition of the State Personnel Administration and the transfer of functions.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 413, § 13/HB 805, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that:
“This Act shall become effective on July 1, 2012, only if an Act abolishing the State Personnel Administration and providing for the transfer of certain functions of such agency to the Department of Administrative Services is enacted and becomes effective on that same date; otherwise, this Act shall not become effective and shall stand repealed on July 1, 2012.”
Ga. L. 2012, p. 446/HB 642, effective July 1, 2012, provides for the abolition of the State Personnel Administration and the transfer of functions.

47-3-61.
[Reserved] Membership of persons who teach in both a public and private school system; payment of employer contributions for such persons.

History.

Repealed by Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 42, effective July 1, 2010.

Editor’s notes.

This Code section was based on Ga. L. 1969, p. 227, § 1.

Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “The intent of this Act is to repeal obsolete and inoperative provisions and to make certain stylistic corrections in Title 47 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated. Nothing in this Act shall deny, abridge, increase, renew, revive, or on any way affect any right, benefit, option, credit, or election to which any person was entitled pursuant to such title on June 30, 2010, and the board of trustees of each public retirement system is authorized and directed to provide by regulation for the continuation of any such right, benefit, option, credit, or election not otherwise covered in this Act; provided, however, that any such right, benefit, option, credit, or election shall be subject to the statutory provisions in effect on June 30, 2010.”

47-3-62.
Membership of visiting teachers and attendance officers employed in lieu of visiting teachers.

Visiting teachers employed under Subpart 2 of Part 1 of Article 16 of Chapter 2 of Title 20 shall have the same status under the retirement system as regular classroom teachers or supervisors whose employment requires that they hold valid certificates issued by authority of the state.

For service rendered after June 30, 1992, attendance officers employed in lieu of visiting teachers, if employed not less than half time, shall be members of the retirement system.

History.

Ga. L. 1945, p. 343, § 8; Ga. L. 1992, p. 2182, § 2.

47-3-63.
Membership of full-time public school support personnel; employee and employer contributions; creditable service.

In accordance with Code Section 47-4-40, full-time public school lunchroom, maintenance, or warehouse managers or supervisors or full-time public school transportation managers or supervisors including those employed by postsecondary vocational-technical schools governed by the Technical College System of Georgia may elect to become members of the Teachers Retirement System of Georgia. Any such personnel exercising such option shall begin making the employee contributions required by this chapter.

Members (1) who were previously eligible for membership in the Public School Employees Retirement System and whose duties were or have been changed in such a manner so as to have made them eligible for membership in the Teachers Retirement System of Georgia and (2) any personnel specified in subsection (a) of this Code section who elect to become members of the Teachers Retirement System of Georgia shall be permitted to establish credit for service rendered in a public school system prior to the date such employees become or became members of the Teachers Retirement System of Georgia, provided that such service would be or would have been normally allowable as creditable service under the Public School Employees Retirement System; provided, further, that such members must pay the employee contributions on the salary earned by such members during the years of service sought to be so established, plus applicable accrued regular interest compounded annually to the dates of payment at the rates adopted by the board of trustees. Such members or the local boards of education by which the members are employed at the time the service is established shall pay the employer contributions on the earnable compensation of such members that would have been paid to the Teachers Retirement System of Georgia, plus applicable accrued regular interest compounded annually to the dates of payment at the rates adopted by the board of trustees.

The State of Georgia shall be the employer of personnel specified in subsection (a) of this Code section for the purposes of employer contributions on membership service rendered by such members after they become members of the Teachers Retirement System of Georgia; provided, however, that a local school system shall pay the employer contributions for the number of its managers or supervisors in each category of employment set forth in subsection (a) of this Code section who are members of this retirement system pursuant to this Code section which exceeds one person or 7 percent, whichever is greater, of the total number of employees of such local school system in such category; provided, further, that the state shall continue to pay employer contributions for all members who became members of this system pursuant to this Code section prior to April 1, 1992.

History.

Ga. L. 1976, p. 577, § 4; Ga. L. 1978, p. 1997, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 47; Ga. L. 1982, p. 965, § 2; Ga. L. 1987, p. 575, § 10; Ga. L. 1988, p. 1742, § 4; Ga. L. 1992, p. 2528, § 1; Ga. L. 2008, p. 562, § 1/SB 434.

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008, substituted “Technical College System of Georgia” for “Department of Technical and Adult Education” in the first sentence of subsection (a).

47-3-64.
[Reserved] Public school teachers and employees who are covered by local retirement fund and who accept employment with private nonsectarian schools eligible for state grants.

History.

Ga. L. 1957, p. 8, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 47; repealed by Ga. L. 2005, p. 504, § 1/HB 373, effective July 1, 2005.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2005, p. 504, § 1/HB 373 repealed and reserved this Code section, effective July 1, 2005.

47-3-65.
Membership, rights, and benefits in local retirement funds.

Except as otherwise provided by paragraph (5) of subsection (e) of Code Section 47-3-60, teachers in the service of an employer operating a local retirement fund shall not be members of the Teachers Retirement System of Georgia. Such teachers shall make no contributions to this retirement system and shall be eligible for pension benefits under this retirement system only under this Code section. If such a teacher retires under his or her local retirement fund and if at the time of his or her retirement he or she would have been eligible for service retirement under this retirement system had he or she been a member, the board of trustees shall pay from this retirement system to the managing board of the local retirement fund a pension equal to the pension for membership service which would have been payable under this retirement system in respect to the part of his or her earnable compensation payable from state funds if such member had been classified as a member of this retirement system immediately prior to the time of his or her retirement; provided, however, upon service retirement of any teacher who is a member of a local retirement fund, the local retirement fund under which such teacher retired shall receive a service retirement pension on account of his or her service thereunder, in accordance with the provisions of this Code section, which shall consist of:

A pension equal to the annuity which would have been allowable at age of retirement if such teacher had been a member of this retirement system and had made contributions of 5 percent of his or her earnable compensation payable from state funds, but not to exceed an annuity allowable at age 65, computed on the basis of such contributions as would have been made prior to age 65; and

If he or she has a prior service certificate in full force and effect, an additional pension equal to the annuity which would have been provided at age of retirement, but not to exceed an annuity which would have been provided at age 65 by three times the amount of his or her prior service accumulations as heretofore defined, with regular interest thereon from time to time in effect from the date of establishment until the date of his or her retirement, but not beyond age 65.

It shall be the duty of the employers operating local retirement funds to report to the board of trustees annually or at such other intervals as shall be set by the board of trustees the earnable compensation paid from state funds of each teacher in their employ who is paid from state funds and such other information as may be needed for establishing the prospective benefit of the member.

History.

Ga. L. 1943, p. 640, § 9; Ga. L. 1953, Nov.-Dec. Sess., p. 341, § 1; Ga. L. 1962, p. 723, § 9; Ga. L. 1966, p. 564, § 2; Ga. L. 1977, p. 825, §§ 6, 7; Ga. L. 1981, p. 1892, § 2; Ga. L. 1981, p. 1894, § 4; Ga. L. 1993, p. 86, § 1; Ga. L. 2000, p. 131, § 1; Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 43/SB 436.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, rewrote this Code section.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “The intent of this Act is to repeal obsolete and inoperative provisions and to make certain stylistic corrections in Title 47 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated. Nothing in this Act shall deny, abridge, increase, renew, revive, or on any way affect any right, benefit, option, credit, or election to which any person was entitled pursuant to such title on June 30, 2010, and the board of trustees of each public retirement system is authorized and directed to provide by regulation for the continuation of any such right, benefit, option, credit, or election not otherwise covered in this Act; provided, however, that any such right, benefit, option, credit, or election shall be subject to the statutory provisions in effect on June 30, 2010.”

47-3-66.
Membership of teachers who are employed by independent school systems; creditable service.

As used in this Code section, the term:

“Independent school system” means the independent school system of a municipality.

“Local retirement fund” means a local retirement fund covering teachers employed by an independent school system.

“Municipality” means any municipality of this state having a population of 300,000 or more according to the United States decennial census of 1970 or any future such census.

“Teacher” means any teacher as defined by Code Section 47-3-1 who is employed by an independent school system.

Any teacher who is employed by an independent school system after July 1, 1979, shall become a member of the retirement system as a condition of employment, and such teacher shall not be eligible for membership in a local retirement fund.

Teachers who are actively employed on July 1, 1979, by an employer operating under a local retirement fund may elect to transfer from membership in the local retirement fund to membership in the Teachers Retirement System of Georgia, effective July 1, 1979. Such election must be made before July 1, 1979, in a manner prescribed by the board of trustees. All such teachers who transfer their membership to the retirement system under this Code section shall receive creditable service under the retirement system, equivalent to the creditable service such teachers had under the local retirement fund as of the date all payments are made as provided in subsections (d) and (e) of this Code section, provided that no creditable service shall be granted for service which would not otherwise be allowable under the retirement system. The board of trustees shall cause the records of such transferred teachers, after verification in the manner prescribed by the board of trustees, to reflect such creditable service.

For each teacher becoming a member of the retirement system pursuant to subsection (c) of this Code section, the fiscal authority or other governing body, by whatever name designated, of the local retirement fund shall be empowered and shall have the duty to pay to the board of trustees the amount of contributions paid by such teacher to the local retirement fund and credited to each such teacher under it, together with applicable accrued regular interest, as determined by the board of trustees, to the date of payment. The fiscal authority or other governing body shall have the duty to notify the board of trustees as to the amount paid on behalf of each such teacher. Such payment shall be made to the board of trustees by not later than October 1, 1979, or by the date of retirement of any teachers who retire prior to October 1, 1979, whichever is earlier.

Each teacher who becomes a member of the retirement system pursuant to subsection (c) of this Code section shall pay to the board of trustees the amount of contributions which would have been paid by the teacher to the retirement system had the teacher been a member of the retirement system during the period of creditable service established pursuant to subsection (c) of this Code section, plus interest, as provided in this subsection, which would have accumulated on such contributions, less the amount paid on behalf of each such teacher pursuant to subsection (d) of this Code section. Interest which would have accumulated on such contributions shall be computed on the basis of regular accrued interest until January 1, 1982, and on the basis of 16 percent per annum from January 1, 1982, until the payment required by this subsection is made. The board of trustees shall determine the amount to be paid as interest. Such payment shall and must be made to the board of trustees in the manner prescribed by the board of trustees by not later than December 31, 1983, or by the date of retirement for any teacher who retires prior to December 31, 1983, whichever is earlier.

History.

Ga. L. 1979, p. 1196, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 1610, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1985, p. 209, § 1; Ga. L. 1993, p. 86, § 1; Ga. L. 1993, p. 1402, § 18; Ga. L. 2010, p. 863, § 2/SB 296; Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 44/SB 436.

The 2010 amendments. —

The first 2010 amendment, effective July 1, 2010, substituted “Office of the State Treasurer” for “Office of Treasury and Fiscal Services” six times in subsection (i). The second 2010 amendment, effective July 1, 2010, deleted former subsections (f) through (m). See the Code Commission note regarding the effect of these amendments.

Code Commission notes.

The amendment of this Code section by Ga. L. 2010, p. 863, § 2, irreconcilably conflicted with and was treated as superseded by Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 44.
See County of Butts v. Strahan,

151 Ga. 417

(1921); Keener v. McDougall,

232 Ga. 273

(1974).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “The intent of this Act is to repeal obsolete and inoperative provisions and to make certain stylistic corrections in Title 47 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated. Nothing in this Act shall deny, abridge, increase, renew, revive, or on any way affect any right, benefit, option, credit, or election to which any person was entitled pursuant to such title on June 30, 2010, and the board of trustees of each public retirement system is authorized and directed to provide by regulation for the continuation of any such right, benefit, option, credit, or election not otherwise covered in this Act; provided, however, that any such right, benefit, option, credit, or election shall be subject to the statutory provisions in effect on June 30, 2010.”